pt-BR: Reclinação, tipo: Reclinável deslizante; Deslizante manual; De balanço manual; Elevação elétrica; Giratória de balanço; Fixa com push-back; Giratória; Deslizante e giratória; Reclinável elétrica de cinema; Zero-wall/Wall-hugger; Outro
ja: リクライニングモーションタイプ: グライダーリクライニング; 手動グライダー; 手動ロッカー; パワーリフト; ロッカースイベル; 固定式プッシュバック; スイベル; スイベルグライダー; シアターパワーリクライニング; ゼロウォール/ウォールハガー; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de movimento da poltrona reclinável: Reclinação deslizante; Deslizador manual; Balanço manual; Elevação elétrica; Balanço e rotação; Estacionário com pressão para trás; Rotação; Deslizador giratório; Reclinação elétrica de cinema; Distância zero da parede; Outro
ru: Тип движения кресла-реклайнера: Глайдер с откидной спинкой; Ручной глайдер; Ручное кресло-качалка; Электроподъемник; Кресло-качалка с вращением; Стационарный с откидной спинкой; С вращением; Глайдер с вращением; Театральный электрореклайнер; Нулевое расстояние от стены / Wall-hugger; Другое
th: ประเภทการเคลื่อนไหวของเก้าอี้ปรับเอน: เลื่อนเอน; เลื่อนแบบแมนนวล; โยกแบบแมนนวล; ยกด้วยไฟฟ้า; โยกหมุน; อยู่กับที่ดันไปด้านหลัง; หมุน; เลื่อนหมุน; เอนด้วยไฟฟ้าแบบโรงภาพยนตร์; ตั้งชิดผนัง; อื่นๆ
da: Bevægelsestype for hvilestol: Glidende lænefunktion; Manuel glidning; Manuel gyngefunktion; Elektrisk lift; Gynge- og drejefunktion; Stationær ryglænsvip; Drejefunktion; Dreje- og glidefunktion; Elektrisk lænefunktion (biograf); Pladsbesparende ryglænsvip (Wall-hugger); Andet
nl: Type beweging relaxfauteuil: Glijdend verstelbaar; Handmatige glider; Handmatige schommelstoel; Elektrische lift; Schommelend en draaiend; Stationaire push-back; Draaibaar; Draaibare glider; Elektrische theater-verstelling; Zero-wall/Wall-hugger; Overig
cs: Typ pohybu polohovacího křesla: Kluzné houpání s polohováním; Ruční kluzné houpání; Ruční houpání; Elektrické zvedání; Houpací a otočné; Stacionární zatlačením; Otočné; Otočné kluzné houpání; Elektrické polohování (kino); Zero-wall / Wall-hugger; Ostatní
ko: 리클라이너 구동 방식: 글라이더 리클라이닝; 수동 글라이더; 수동 로커; 파워 리프트; 로커 회전식; 고정식 푸시백; 회전식; 회전식 글라이더; 시어터 파워 리클라이닝; 제로월/월허거; 기타
zh-CN: 伸缩躺椅调节类型: 滑翔倾斜; 手动滑翔; 手动摇椅; 电动升降; 摇摆旋转; 固定式后推; 旋转; 旋转滑翔; 影院级电动躺椅; 零靠墙/贴墙; 其他
hu: Pihenőfotel mozgástípusa: Csúszó-dönthető; Kézi csúszó; Kézi hintázó; Elektromos emelő; Hintázó-forgó; Fix hátradőlős; Forgó; Forgó-csúszó; Mozis elektromos dönthető; Helytakarékos (zero-wall); Egyéb
es: Tipo de movimiento del sillón reclinable: Reclinable deslizante; Deslizante manual; Mecedora manual; Elevación eléctrica; Mecedora giratoria; Fijo con empuje hacia atrás; Giratorio; Deslizante giratorio; Reclinable eléctrico tipo cine; Espacio cero/pegado a la pared; Otro
sk-SK: Typ pohybu polohovacieho kresla: Klzné polohovanie; Manuálne klzanie; Manuálne hojdanie; Elektrické zdvíhanie; Hojdacie s otáčaním; Stacionárne so zatlačením dozadu; Otočné; Otočné klzné; Elektrické polohovanie pre domáce kino; Do nulovej vzdialenosti od steny; Iné
vi: Loại chuyển động ghế ngả: Ngả lưng trượt; Trượt thủ công; Bập bênh thủ công; Nâng bằng điện; Bập bênh xoay; Đẩy ra sau cố định; Xoay; Trượt xoay; Ngả lưng điện kiểu rạp hát; Sát tường; Khác
tr: Yatar koltuk hareket tipi: Kızaklı yatar; Manuel kızaklı; Manuel sallanan; Elektrikli kaldıraç; Sallanan ve dönen; Sabit arkaya itmeli; Dönen; Dönen kızaklı; Sinema tipi elektrikli yatar; Duvara sıfır; Diğer
zh-TW: 躺椅動作類型: 滑翔傾斜式; 手動滑翔式; 手動搖椅; 電動升降; 旋轉搖椅; 固定後推式; 旋轉; 旋轉滑翔式; 劇院電動傾斜; 零靠牆/貼牆式; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta gibanja počivalnika: Drsni nagib; Ročni gugalnik/drsnik; Ročni gugalnik; Električni dvig; Vrtljivi gugalnik; Fiksni stol s potiskom nazaj; Vrtljivi; Vrtljivi gugalnik/drsnik; Kino električni nagib; Zero-wall / za ob steno; Drugo
en: Recliner motion type: Glider Recline; Manual Glider; Manual Rocker; Power Lift; Rocker Swivel; Stationary Push-back; Swivel; Swivel Glider; Theater Power Recline; Zero-wall/Wall-hugger; Other
nb: Bevegelsestype for lenestol: Glidefunksjon; Manuell glidefunksjon; Manuell gyngestol; Elektrisk løft; Gynge- og svingfunksjon; Stasjonær tilbakelening; Svingbar; Sving- og glidefunksjon; Elektrisk kino-tilbakelening; Veggbesparende; Annet
pl: Typ ruchu fotela rozkładanego: Odchylany (glider); Glider ręczny; Bujany ręczny; Elektryczny z funkcją podnoszenia; Bujany obrotowy; Stacjonarny (push-back); Obrotowy; Obrotowy glider; Kinowy elektrycznie odchylany; Zero-wall / Wall-hugger; Inne
it: Tipo di motion del recliner: Reclinabile scorrevole; Scorrevole manuale; A dondolo manuale; Alzapersona elettrico; A dondolo girevole; Spinta all’indietro fissa; Girevole; Scorrevole girevole; Reclinabile elettrico da cinema; Salvaspazio/Zero-wall; Altro
bg-BG: Тип движение на облегалката: Плъзгане и накланяне; Ръчно плъзгане (Glider); Ръчно люлеене (Rocker); Електрическо повдигане; Люлеене и въртене; Стационарно с облягане назад; Въртене; Въртене и плъзгане; Кино кресло с електрическо накланяне; За близо до стена (Zero-wall); Други
ro-RO: Tip de mișcare a fotoliului rabatabil: Glisare cu înclinare; Glisare manuală; Balansare manuală; Ridicare electrică; Balansare cu rotire; Fix cu împingere pe spate; Rotire; Glisare cu rotire; Înclinare electrică tip cinema; Economisire spațiu (zero-wall); Altele
el: Τύπος κίνησης ανακλινόμενης πολυθρόνας: Ανάκλιση με ολίσθηση; Χειροκίνητη ολίσθηση; Χειροκίνητη λίκνιση; Ηλεκτρική ανύψωση; Περιστροφική λίκνιση; Σταθερό push-back; Περιστροφικό; Περιστροφική ολίσθηση; Ηλεκτρική ανάκλιση θεάτρου; Προστασίας τοίχου; Άλλο
sv: Typ av fåtöljrörelse: Glidfunktion med fällning; Manuell glidfunktion; Manuell gungfunktion; Elektrisk lyftfunktion; Gung- och snurrfunktion; Fast (push-back); Snurrfunktion; Snurr- och glidfunktion; Elektrisk biofåtölj; Zero-wall/wall-hugger; Övrigt
fi: Lepotuolin liikkeen tyyppi: Liukuva kallistus; Manuaalinen liuku; Manuaalinen keinu; Sähköinen nosto; Keinuva ja pyörivä; Kiinteä työnnettävä selkänoja; Pyörivä; Pyörivä ja liukuva; Teatterituoli sähköisellä kallistuksella; Tilaa säästävä (wall-hugger); Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta gibanja naslonjača: Klizno naginjanje; Ručni klizač; Ručna ljuljačka; Električno podizanje; Okretna ljuljačka; Fiksno potiskivanje unatrag; Okretno; Okretni klizač; Kino-sjedalo s električnim naginjanjem; Uz zid (zero-wall); Ostalo
de: Bewegungsmechanismus des Liegesessels: Gleiter mit Liegefunktion; Manueller Gleiter; Manueller Schaukelsessel; Elektrische Aufstehhilfe; Schaukel- und Drehsessel; Stationärer Push-Back; Drehsessel; Drehbarer Gleiter; Kinosessel mit elektrischer Liegefunktion; Wandfrei / Wall-Hugger; Sonstige
fr: Type de mécanisme du fauteuil inclinable: Inclinable et glissant; Glissant manuel; Berçant manuel; Releveur électrique; Berçant pivotant; Fixe par poussée; Pivotant; Glissant pivotant; Inclinable électrique de cinéma; Dos au mur / Gain de place; Autre
lt-LT: Atlošiamojo krėslo judesio tipas: Slystamasis atlošimas; Rankinis slystamasis; Rankinis supamasis; Elektrinis pakėlimas; Supamasis sukamasis; Stacionarus atlošiamas spaudžiant; Sukamasis; Sukamasis slystamasis; Elektrinis kino teatro atlošimas; Kompaktiškas („Zero-wall“ / „Wall-hugger“); Kitas